Connecticut, session 2026, HB05238.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
1 Section 1. (Effective July 1, 2026) (a) The Commissioner of Emergency
2 Services and Public Protection shall establish a working group to study
3 and make recommendations regarding parking access challenges faced
4 by home health care service providers while delivering services in
5 residential settings. Such study shall include, but need not be limited to,
6 (1) an assessment of parking restrictions, time limits, permit
7 requirements and enforcement practices affecting home health care
8 service providers, (2) an analysis of geographic areas in the state where
9 parking limitations most significantly impact the delivery of home
10 health care services, and (3) a review of parking accommodation
11 programs in other jurisdictions, including temporary permits and
12 designated home health care service parking and enforcement
13 exemptions.
sHB5238 / File No. 411 1

sHB5238 File No. 411
14 (b) The Commissioner of Emergency Services and Public Protection,
15 or the commissioner's designee, shall be chairperson of the working
16 group and shall schedule the first meeting of the working group not
17 later than September 1, 2026. The commissioner shall appoint to such
18 working group representatives from parking authorities or parking
19 divisions, providers of home health care services, sworn members of
20 municipal police departments and such other members as deemed
21 necessary by the commissioner.
22 (c) Not later than January 1, 2027, the commissioner shall submit a
23 report on the findings and recommendations of the working group to
24 the joint standing committee of the General Assembly having
25 cognizance of matters relating to transportation, in accordance with the
26 provisions of section 11-4a of the general statutes. The working group
27 shall terminate on the date that the commissioner submits such report
28 or January 1, 2027, whichever is later.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 July 1, 2026 New section
Statement of Legislative Commissioners:
In Subsec. (c), "its findings and recommendations" was changed to "the
findings and recommendations of the working group", and "it" was
changed to "the commissioner" for clarity.
TRA Joint Favorable Subst. -LCO
sHB5238 / File No. 411 2

sHB5238 File No. 411
The following Fiscal Impact Statement and Bill Analysis are prepared for the benefit of the members of
the General Assembly, solely for purposes of information, summarization and explanation and do not
represent the intent of the General Assembly or either chamber thereof for any purpose. In general,
fiscal impacts are based upon a variety of informational sources, including the analyst’s professional
knowledge. Whenever applicable, agency data is consulted as part of the analysis, however final
products do not necessarily reflect an assessment from any specific department.
OFA Fiscal Note
State Impact: None
Municipal Impact: None
Explanation
The bill, which has no fiscal impact, requires the Department of
Emergency Services and Public Protection to establish a working group
to study and make recommendations regarding parking access
challenges faced by home health care service providers. It is anticipated
that the members of the working group will have the necessary
expertise to meet the requirements of the bill.
The Out Years
State Impact: None
Municipal Impact: None
sHB5238 / File No. 411 3

sHB5238 File No. 411
OLR Bill Analysis
sHB 5238
AN ACT STUDYING ACCESS TO PARKING FOR HOME HEALTH
CARE SERVICE PROVIDERS.